Utah statutes.
76-6-1003.   Mail theft -- Penalties.

(1)  A person commits the crime of mail theft if the person:

(a)  knowingly, and with the intent to deprive another:

(i)  takes, destroys, hides, or embezzles mail; or

(ii)  obtains any mail by fraud or deception; or

(b)  buys, receives, conceals, or possesses mail and knows or reasonably should have known that the mail was unlawfully taken or obtained.

(2)  Mail theft is a:

(a)  felony of the second degree if the value of the mail is or exceeds $5,000;

(b)  felony of the third degree if the value of the mail is or exceeds $1,000, but is less than $5,000 in value; and

(c)  class A misdemeanor if the value of the mail is less than $1,000 in value or the value cannot be ascertained.

